North Dakota, session 69, HB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Section 54-01-09.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
54 - 01 - 09.4. United States military installations - Concurrent jurisdiction .
1. The state accepts the relinquishment of exclusive legislative jurisdiction from the United States
in accordance with this section.
2. The state has concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the United States over any United States
military installation under the control of the United States which is located within the
boundaries of this state.
3. The concurrent legislative jurisdiction over a United States military installation under this
section is effective upon the governor's written acceptance of a request filed by the principal
officer, or other authorized representative who has supervision or control over the military
installation under chapter 159 of United States Code title 10 [10 U.S.C. 2683], of the military
installation where concurrent legislative jurisdiction is sought, relinquishing exclusive
legislative jurisdiction and retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the military
installation.
4. The governor may not accept a request filed under subsection 3 unless the request :
a. States the name, position, and authority of the individual requesting the cession;
b. States the subject matter for the concurrent jurisdiction request;
c. Describes by metes and bounds the United States military installation subject to the
concurrent legislative jurisdiction request; and
d. Indicates whether the request includes future contiguous expansions of land acquired for
military purposes.
5. If the governor accepts a request filed under subsection 3 :
a. The governor's acceptance must state each element of the request which is accepted;
and
b. The governor shall submit the following documents to the secretary of state to index and
submit copies to the individual who filed the request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction:
(1) The request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction;
(2) The governor's written acceptance of concurrent legislative jurisdiction; and
(3) A description by metes and bounds of the United States military installation subject
to the concurrent legislative jurisdiction.

H. B. NO. 1033 - PAGE 2
6. The state may not incur or assume liability as a result of accepting concurrent legislative
jurisdiction under this section.
7. After concurrent legislative jurisdiction is established under this section, a state agency or a
political subdivision may enter a reciprocal agreement with a United States agency to
designate duties related to the concurrent legislative jurisdiction between the parties.

H. B. NO. 1033 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1033.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State